Utah statutes.
53A-25b-304.   U-PASS testing and reporting.
(1)  The Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall annually administer, as
applicable, the U-PASS tests specified in Section 53A-1-602, except a student
may take an alternative test in accordance with the student's IEP.
(2)  By November 30 of each year, through 2011, the Utah Schools for the Deaf
and the Blind shall report to the board and the Education Interim Committee
the following data:
(a)  number of students served;
(b)  services provided;
(c)  student participation in state assessments;
(d)  academic achievement of students; and
(e)  the impact on enrollment at the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind
resulting from statutory changes regarding eligibility.
